tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Unified English Braille Code (Grade 2)
#
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2008 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#  Copyright (C) 2016 American Printing House for the Blind, Inc. www.aph.org
#  Copyright (C) 2016 Joseph Lee <joseph.lee22590@gmail.com>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Maintained by John J. Boyer john.boyer@jjb-software.com
#                Mike Gray <mgray@aph.org>
#  Modified by Mike Gray <mgray@aph.org>
#              Joseph Lee <joseph.lee22590@gmail.com>

include en-ueb-g1.ctb

multind 56-6 letsign capsletter

seqdelimiter -—
seqdelimiter ‐   \x2010
seqdelimiter ‑   \x2011
seqdelimiter –   \x2013
seqdelimiter —   \x2014
seqbeforechars ([{"“'‘
seqafterchars  )]}"”'’.,;:.!?…
seqafterpattern 'd
seqafterpattern 'll
seqafterpattern 're
seqafterpattern 's
seqafterpattern 't
seqafterpattern 've
#TODO:  all caps words (see lou_translateString.c:inSequence()
seqafterpattern 'D
seqafterpattern 'LL
seqafterpattern 'RE
seqafterpattern 'S
seqafterpattern 'T
seqafterpattern 'VE
seqafterexpression '([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E)

#   10.1   Alphabetic Wordsigns
#   - 10.1.1   standing alone
#   - 10.1.2   followed by 'd, 'll, 're, 's, 't, 've and standing alone
#   - 2.6.4

#   must be before contractions?
match %[^_~]%<* as ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1356
match %[^_~]%<* but ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12
match %[^_~]%<* can ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 14
match %[^_~]%<* do ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 145
match %[^_~]%<* every ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 15
match %[^_~]%<* from ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 124
match %[^_~]%<* go ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1245
match %[^_~]%<* have ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125
match %[^_~]%<* it ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1346
match %[^_~]%<* just ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 245
match %[^_~]%<* knowledge ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13
match %[^_~]%<* like ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 123
match %[^_~]%<* more ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 134
match %[^_~]%<* not ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1345
match %[^_~]%<* people ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234
match %[^_~]%<* quite ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12345
match %[^_~]%<* rather ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1235
match %[^_~]%<* so ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234
match %[^_~]%<* that ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345
match %[^_~]%<* us ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 136
match %[^_~]%<* very ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1236
match %[^_~]%<* will ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2456
match %[^_~]%<* you ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13456

contraction b
contraction c
contraction d
contraction e
contraction f
contraction g
contraction h
contraction j
contraction k
contraction l
contraction m
contraction n
contraction p
contraction q
contraction r
contraction s
contraction t
contraction u
contraction v
contraction w
contraction x
contraction y
contraction z

contraction B
contraction C
contraction D
contraction E
contraction F
contraction G
contraction H
contraction J
contraction K
contraction L
contraction M
contraction N
contraction P
contraction Q
contraction R
contraction S
contraction T
contraction U
contraction V
contraction W
contraction X
contraction Y
contraction Z


#   10.2   Strong Wordsigns
#   - 10.2.1   standing alone
#   - 10.2.2   followed by 'd, 'll, 're, 's, 't, 've and standing alone
#   - 2.6.4

match %[^_~]%<* child ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 16
match %[^_~]%<* out ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1256
match %[^_~]%<* shall ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 146
match %[^_~]%<* still ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 34
match %[^_~]%<* this ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1456
match %[^_~]%<* which ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 156


#   10.3   Strong Contractions
#   - 10.11.2

# end
always and 12346

# for
always for 123456

# of
always of 12356

#match [Bb] io f =
#match [Cc]h loro f =
#match [Ii]n so f =
#match [Pp] iano f =
#match [Rr] ibo f =
#match [Ss]t yro f =
#match [Tt] wo f =
#match [Mm] icro [fw] =   ow 10.4.2
#match [Rr] etro f =

sufword aeroflot 1-12456-135-124-123-135-2345
sufword biofeedback 12-24-135-124-15-1246-12-1-14-13
sufword chlorofluorocarbon 16-123-135-1235-135-124-123-136-135-1235-135-14-345-12-135-1345
sufword chloroform 16-123-135-1235-135-123456-134
sufword filofax 124-24-123-135-124-1-1346
sufword hydrofoil 125-13456-145-1235-135-124-135-24-123
sufword insofar 35-234-135-124-345
sufword microfiche 134-24-14-1235-135-124-24-16-15
sufword microfilm 134-24-14-1235-135-124-24-123-134
sufword microwave 134-24-14-1235-135-2456-1-1236-15
sufword microwaved 134-24-14-1235-135-2456-1-1236-1246
sufword microwaving 134-24-14-1235-135-2456-1-1236-346
sufword pianoforte 1234-24-1-1345-135-123456-2345-15
sufword retrofit 1235-15-2345-1235-135-124-24-2345
sufword riboflavin 1235-24-12-135-124-123-1-1236-35
sufword styrofoam 34-13456-1235-135-124-135-1-134
sufword twofer 2345-2456-135-124-12456
sufword twofold 2345-2456-135-124-135-123-145

# the
always the 2346

sufword aesthete 1-15-234-2346-2345-15
sufword aesthetic 1-15-234-2346-2345-24-14
sufword anaesthesia 1-1345-1-15-234-2346-234-24-1
sufword anaesthetic 1-1345-1-15-234-2346-2345-24-14
sufword anaesthetist 1-1345-1-15-234-2346-2345-24-34
sufword anaesthetize 1-1345-1-15-234-2346-2345-24-1356-15
sufword anaesthetized 1-1345-1-15-234-2346-2345-24-1356-1246
sufword anaesthetizing 1-1345-1-15-234-2346-2345-24-1356-346
sufword anesthesia 1-1345-15-234-2346-234-24-1
sufword anesthesiologist 1-1345-15-234-2346-234-24-135-123-135-1245-24-34
sufword anesthesiology 1-1345-15-234-2346-234-24-135-123-135-1245-13456
sufword anesthetic 1-1345-15-234-2346-2345-24-14
sufword anesthetist 1-1345-15-234-2346-2345-24-34
sufword anesthetize 1-1345-15-234-2346-2345-24-1356-15
sufword anesthetized 1-1345-15-234-2346-2345-24-1356-1246
sufword anesthetizing 1-1345-15-234-2346-2345-24-1356-346
sufword calisthenic 14-1-123-24-234-2346-1345-24-14
sufword demosthenes 145-15-134-135-234-2346-1345-15-234
sufword eratosthenes 12456-1-2345-135-234-2346-1345-15-234
sufword esther 15-234-2346-1235
sufword esthete 15-234-2346-2345-15
sufword esthetic 15-234-2346-2345-24-14
sufword fainthearted 124-1-35-2345-125-15-345-2345-1246
sufword fathead 124-1-2345-125-2-145
sufword hothead 125-135-2345-125-2-145
sufword lightheaded 123-24-126-2345-125-2-145-1246
sufword lighthearted 123-24-126-2345-125-15-345-2345-1246
sufword motheaten 134-135-1456-2-2345-26
sufword northeast 1345-135-1235-1456-2-34
sufword prostheses 1234-1235-135-234-2346-234-15-234
sufword prosthesis 1234-1235-135-234-2346-234-24-234
sufword prosthetic 1234-1235-135-234-2346-2345-24-14
sufword softhearted 234-12356-2345-125-15-345-2345-1246
sufword southeast 234-1256-1456-2-34
sufword sweetheart 234-2456-15-15-2345-125-15-345-2345
sufword thence 1456-56-15

# with
always with 23456


#   10.4   Strong Groupsigns
#   - 10.4.2    ch sh th wh ou st
#   - 10.4.3    ing
#   - 10.11.2   ch gh sh th wh
#   - 2.6.4     referred from 10.4.2 - 10.2

# ar
always ar 345
match (%[^_~]%<*) ar ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?(%>*%[^_~]) =

sufword aright 1-5-1235
sufword infrared 35-124-1235-1-1235-1246
sufword tearoom 2345-2-1235-135-135-134

# ch   10.4.2   10.11.2
always ch 16
match (%[^_~]%<*) ch ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?(%>*%[^_~]) =

sufword overreact 135-1236-12456-1235-15-1-14-2345
sufword overreaction 135-1236-12456-1235-15-1-14-56-1345
sufword react 1235-15-1-14-2345
sufword reaction 1235-15-1-14-56-1345

# ed
always ed 1246

sufword airedale 1-24-1235-15-145-1-123-15
sufword comedown 14-135-134-15-145-246-1345
sufword daredevil 145-345-15-145-15-1236-24-123
sufword dumbledore 145-136-134-12-123-15-145-135-1235-15
sufword hoedown 125-135-15-145-246-1345
sufword kettledrum 13-15-2345-2345-123-15-145-1235-136-134
sufword nosedive 1345-135-234-15-145-24-1236-15
sufword nosedived 1345-135-234-15-145-24-1236-1246
sufword nosediving 1345-135-234-15-145-24-1236-346
sufword shakedown 146-1-13-15-145-246-1345
sufword thistledown 1456-24-34-123-15-145-246-1345
sufword tumbledown 2345-136-134-12-123-15-145-246-1345
sufword turtledove 2345-136-1235-2345-123-15-145-135-1236-15
sufword tweedledee 2345-2456-15-1246-123-15-145-15-15
sufword tweedledum 2345-2456-15-1246-123-15-145-136-134
sufword viced 1236-24-14-15-145

# er
always er 12456

sufword hedgerow 125-1246-1245-15-1235-246
sufword homeroom 125-135-134-15-1235-135-135-134
sufword horseradish 125-135-1235-234-15-1235-1-145-24-146
sufword spareribs 234-1234-345-15-1235-24-12-234
sufword stateroom 34-1-2345-15-1235-135-135-134
sufword storeroom 34-135-1235-15-1235-135-135-134
sufword viceregal 1236-24-14-15-1235-15-1245-1-123
sufword viceroy 1236-24-14-15-1235-135-13456

#TODO:  check pronunciation
sufword castlereagh 14-1-34-123-15-1235-2-126

# gh
always gh 126
match (%[^_~]%<*) gh ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?(%>*%[^_~]) =

sufword bighearted 12-24-1245-125-15-345-2345-1246
sufword bighorn 12-24-1245-125-135-1235-1345
sufword bunghole 12-136-1345-1245-125-135-123-15
sufword doghouse 145-135-1245-125-1256-234-15
sufword foghorn 124-135-1245-125-135-1235-1345
sufword pigheaded 1234-24-1245-125-2-145-1246
sufword shanghai 146-1-1345-1245-125-1-24
sufword yoghourt 13456-135-1245-125-1256-1235-2345

#TODO:  check pronunciation
sufword senghor 234-26-1245-125-135-1235
sufword songhai 234-135-1345-126-1-24

# ing
match !%[^_~] ing - 346
#nofor endword ing's 346-3-234
#nofor endword ingly 346-123-13456
nofor midendword ing 346
nofor always ing 35-1245

sufword disingenuous 256-35-1245-26-136-1256-234
sufword leningrad 123-26-35-1245-1235-1-145
sufword stalingrad 34-1-123-35-1245-1235-1-145
sufword vainglorious 1236-1-35-1245-123-135-1235-24-1256-234
sufword vainglory 1236-1-35-1245-123-135-1235-13456

# ou
always ou 1256
#match (%[^_~]%<*) ou ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?(%>*%[^_~]) =

# ow
always ow 246

sufword autoworker 1-136-2345-135-5-2456-12456
sufword coworker 14-135-5-2456-12456
sufword kilowatt 13-24-123-135-2456-1-2345-2345
sufword locoweed 123-135-14-135-2456-15-1246
sufword monowheel 134-135-1345-135-156-15-15-123
sufword noway 1345-135-2456-1-13456
sufword nowhere 1345-135-5-156
sufword nowise 1345-135-2456-24-234-15

# sh
always sh 146
match (%[^_~]%<*) sh ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?(%>*%[^_~]) =

sufword asshole 1-234-234-125-135-123-15
sufword grasshopper 1245-1235-1-234-234-125-135-1234-1234-12456
sufword hogshead 125-135-1245-234-125-2-145
sufword mishandle 134-24-234-125-12346-123-15
sufword mishandled 134-24-234-125-12346-123-1246
sufword mishandling 134-24-234-125-12346-123-346
sufword mishap 134-24-234-125-1-1234

#TODO:  check pronunciation
sufword chisholm 16-24-234-125-135-123-134
sufword dachshund 145-1-16-234-125-136-1345-145
sufword florsheim 124-123-135-1235-234-125-15-24-134

# st
always st 34
match (%[^_~]%<*) st ('([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?(%>*%[^_~]) =
